California, session 20252026, AB2622.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2837.102 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2837.102. (a) The board shall establish a Nurse Practitioner Advisory Committee to advise and make recommendations to the board on all matters relating to nurse practitioners, including, but not limited to, education, appropriate standard of care, and other matters specified by the board. The committee shall provide recommendations or guidance to the board when the board is considering disciplinary action against a nurse practitioner.(b) The committee shall consist of four five qualified nurse practitioners, two three physicians and surgeons with demonstrated experience working with nurse practitioners, and one public member. two public members.